District of Columbia statutes.
47-362

Policies enumerated.

(a)

A reprogramming shall be used only when an unforeseen situation develops, and then only if postponement until the next appropriations cycle would result in a serious hardship in the management of the City.

(b)

Reprogrammings shall not be used to establish new programs or to change allocations specifically denied, limited, or increased by the Council in the budget act, or the accompanying budget report or mark-up sheets.

(c)

Any program or project deferred through reprogramming shall not be later accomplished by means of further reprogramming. Funding for such section shall await the regular budget request.

(d)

Should unusual circumstances require changes to the policies included in subsections (a) through (c) of this section, proposals shall be submitted to the Council for approval regardless of the dollar amount involved.

(e)

Repealed.

(f)

Notwithstanding § 47-363, any funds appropriated for Debt Service, as defined in § 47-334(1), in excess of Debt Service requirements:

(1)

May not be reprogrammed, unless the Council approves the reprogramming request by resolution; and

(2)

(A)

At the end of a fiscal year, any excess shall be transferred equally among the Local Streets Ward-Based Capital Projects.

(B)

For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “Local Streets Ward Based Capital Projects” means the District Department of Transportation’s 8 local streets ward-based capital projects (Project No. SR301-SR308), which endeavor to preserve, maintain, repair, or replace the District’s sidewalks, curbs, and local roads.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-100, § 3, 27 DCR 3617
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 102, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1131(b), 57 DCR 181
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1043(d), 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7035, 62 DCR 10905

History

1981 Ed., § 47-362.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-28 added subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 18-111 repealed subsec. (e).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (f).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 designated the existing text of (f)(2) as (f)(2)(A); substituted “equally among the Local Streets Ward-Based Capital Projects” for “to the Capital Fund as Paygo” in (f)(2)(A); and added (f)(2)(B).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1002(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1131(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1131(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1043(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1043(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1043(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7016(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation